California statutes. Education Code
Within 10 days after the end of each month, the county auditor shall report to the superintendent of schools the amount of interest added to registered warrants and paid during the preceding month. The report shall show each district to whose registered warrants, paid during the month covered by the report, interest was added and the amount of the interest for the district. The superintendent of schools shall immediately report, in writing, to the clerk or secretary of each district for which interest was paid, the amount of the interest paid for the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Revolving Funds, School Districts [42800. - 42850.]



  ARTICLE 1. Revolving Cash Fund [42800. - 42806.]

42800.

(a) The governing board of a school district may, with the consent of the county superintendent of schools, establish a revolving cash fund for the use of the chief accounting officer of the school district, by adopting a resolution setting forth the necessity for the revolving cash fund, the officer for whom and the purposes for which the revolving cash fund shall be available, and the amount of the fund. The purposes for which the revolving cash fund shall be available shall include the purposes specified in Section 45167. Three certified copies of the resolution shall be transmitted to the county superintendent of schools. If he or she approves the establishment of the fund, the county superintendent of schools shall endorse his or her consent on the resolution and return one copy to
 the governing board of the school district, and transmit one copy to the county auditor.

(b) The maximum amount allowed for revolving cash funds established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be the lesser of:

(1) Two percent of the school district’s estimated expenditures for the current fiscal year, or

(2) A dollar amount limit of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) for any elementary school or high school district and one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for any unified school district for fiscal year 1990–91. The dollar amount limit for each school district shall, through the 2012–13 fiscal year, be increased annually by the percentage increase in the school district’s revenue limit established by Section 42238, as that section read on January 1, 2013. The dollar amount limit for each school district
 shall thereafter be increased annually by the percentage increase in the school district’s local control funding formula allocation established pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented pursuant to Section 42238.03.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 83.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42801.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this section, the officer for whose use the revolving cash fund is created shall file with the governing body of the district a bond in favor of the district, executed by him as principal and by a surety company authorized under the laws of the state to execute bonds as surety, in an amount not less than double the amount of the revolving cash fund. The bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful administration of the revolving cash fund and upon the willingness and ability of the principal to account for and pay over the revolving cash fund at any time upon the demand of the governing board of the district. The premium on the bond shall be a legal charge against the district, payable from the funds of the district.

(b) In lieu of the bond required by subdivision (a) of this section, an officer may be bonded as provided by Section 41021.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42801.5.

Notwithstanding the requirement to provide for indemnity bonds pursuant to Sections 42650 and 42801, the governing board of a school district may, in lieu thereof, insure against losses caused by an employee or an officer of a school district if the insurance gives the same or greater protection to the school district that a bond would provide in indemnifying the school district against any loss caused by the employee or officer of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

42802.

No bond shall be required when the revolving cash fund does not at any time exceed twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42803.

The governing board of the district shall draw an order, on the form and in the manner required by law for order, requisition, and warrant for the payment of school moneys, payable from the county or special fund of the district, in favor of the officer for whose use the revolving cash fund is created, for the amount of the revolving cash fund, and transmit the order to the county superintendent of schools accompanied by the bond and a certified copy of the resolution. Upon his approving the order, the county superintendent of schools shall detach and retain the bond. Upon his allowing and signing the warrant, the county auditor shall detach and retain the certified copy of the resolution and the county treasurer shall pay the warrant.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42804.

The person entrusted with the revolving fund shall not be authorized to expend any portion of the fund except for services or material, the securing or purchasing of which is a legal charge against the district, and no expenditure shall be made unless a receipt is obtained therefor setting forth the date and the purpose of the expenditure and the amount expended. The governing board of any school district may establish and account for the revolving fund in one or more banks. The account shall be known as “The Revolving Fund Account of (insert name of district) District” and shall be established in the custody of the officer for whose use the revolving cash fund is created who shall be responsible for the payment into the account or accounts of all moneys required to be reimbursed into the account or accounts, and for all expenditures therefrom, subject to such regulations as the governing board prescribes. A bill shall be presented to the district monthly, or oftener if necessary, for the reimbursement of the fund in the same manner as other bills are presented. Bills shall be supported by the receipts required. All sums received in payment of the bills shall be returned to the revolving cash fund or bank account or accounts and each person entrusted with the revolving cash fund shall, upon demand of the county superintendent of schools or the county auditor or of the governing board of the district, give an account of the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42805.

The governing board of the district may at any time reduce or discontinue any revolving cash fund established by its order. Whenever the fund is ordered reduced the person using it shall immediately return to the county treasury the amount necessary to reduce the fund, as ordered by the board. If the fund is discontinued, the person using it shall immediately refund the amount thereof to the county treasurer. In either event a reasonable time shall be allowed the person to reimburse himself by bills presented to the school district for expenditures legally made from the fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42806.

The county superintendent of schools may, with the consent of the county board of education, establish a revolving cash fund for the use of the chief accounting officer of the county superintendent of schools, by adopting a resolution setting forth the necessity for the revolving cash fund, the officer for whom and the purposes for which the revolving cash fund shall be available, and the amount of the fund. The purposes for which the revolving cash fund shall be available shall include the purposes specified in Section 45167. The amount of the fund shall not be more than 2 percent of the estimated expenditures of the county superintendent of schools for the current fiscal year and shall not in any event exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000). Three certified copies of the resolution shall be transmitted to the county board of education. If the county board of education approves the establishment of the fund, the chairman shall endorse his consent on the resolution and return one copy to the county superintendent of schools and transmit one copy to the county auditor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 191, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Alternative Revolving Cash Fund [42810. - 42810.]

42810.

In addition to establishing or maintaining a revolving cash fund under Article 1 (commencing with Section 42800), the governing board of any school district or any county superintendent of schools may, by resolution, establish revolving cash funds for use by school principals and other administrative officials designated by the governing board and acting in accordance with regulations prescribed by the governing board, for services or matériel and for the purposes specified in Section 45167. The resolution shall set forth the necessity for the revolving cash funds, the principals of schools and other administrative officials of the school district designated by the governing board, the purposes for which the revolving cash funds shall be made available, and the amount of the funds. No funds maintained in any revolving cash fund established pursuant to this section shall be available for the purposes of attempting to influence government decisions, entertainment, or any other purpose not related to classroom instruction. The total amount of the funds for each district or county superintendent of schools shall not exceed 3 percent of the current year’s instructional supply budget.

The governing board of any school district or any county superintendent of schools may establish a checking account for the revolving fund in one or more banks. The account shall be established in the custody of the principal or other administrative official designated by the governing board for whose use the revolving cash fund is created. The principal or administrative official in whose name the revolving cash fund is created shall be responsible for all expenditures therefrom, subject to regulations that the governing board prescribes. The governing board shall provide for an audit of the funds on a regular basis.

The revolving cash fund for supplies shall be subject to the bonding provisions of Section 42801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1256, Sec. 11.   Effective October 1, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Prepayment Funds [42820. - 42821.]

42820.

The governing board of any school district may establish a revolving cash fund in any bank or other institution whose deposits are federally insured, for the purpose of paying bills as prescribed in Section 42821. Article 1 (commencing with Section 42800) of this chapter shall not apply to the revolving cash fund established pursuant to this article.

The governing board may appropriate money from the county or joint school district fund in the county treasury belonging to the school district to establish the revolving cash fund.

The maximum amount in the revolving cash fund shall be as follows:

(a) In a school district with 20,000 or more units of average daily attendance, ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) In a school district with 5,000 or more, but less than 20,000, units of average daily attendance, five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) In a school district with 500 or more, but less than 5,000, units of average daily attendance, two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(d) In a school district with less than 500 units of average daily attendance, one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 115, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42821.

The governing board of any school district that has established a revolving cash fund pursuant to Section 42820 shall designate a person or persons who shall be authorized to make immediate payments by check, drawn on the revolving cash fund, for purchases in an amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, including tax and freight, or at the time of preparing the order for those purchases to make the check payable to the vendor permitting him or her to fill in the amount to be paid upon shipment of the purchases, the check to state on its face that it is not valid for more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

A monthly list of the payments shall be submitted to the governing board by the designated person or persons for approval.

Upon approval of those expenditures by the governing board, the clerk of the governing board shall draw an order for the replenishment of the revolving cash fund from the county or joint school district fund in the county treasury belonging to the school district. The order shall be treated in the same manner as prescribed for payment of other claims against the funds of the school district.

Any person who issues a check drawn on the revolving cash fund shall be personally liable for the amount of the check only if the expenditure is in violation of rules and regulations established by the governing board with respect to the revolving cash fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 357.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Revolving Warehouse Stock Funds [42830. - 42833.]

42830.

The governing board of any elementary school district or high school district, may, if the school district maintains a stock of merchandise for school use, establish a revolving fund for budget control and stock accounting purposes, by adopting a resolution setting forth the necessity for the revolving fund, the purpose for which it shall be used and the amount thereof. Three certified copies of the resolutions shall be submitted to the county superintendent of schools, who, if he approves the establishment of the fund, shall endorse his consent upon the resolution, return one copy to the governing board of the school district and transmit one copy to the county auditor.

The governing boards of two or more school districts of any type may, if the school districts maintain a stock of merchandise for school use, establish a common revolving fund for budget control and stock accounting purposes, by adopting a resolution of each district setting forth the necessity for the revolving fund, the purpose for which it shall be used and the amount thereof. Three certified copies of the resolutions shall be submitted to the county superintendent of schools, who, if he approves the establishment of the fund, shall endorse his consent upon the resolution, return one copy to the governing board of the school districts and transmit one copy to the county auditor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42831.

Amounts expended from the revolving fund are restored thereto through payments into the revolving fund by warrants drawn on the various funds of the districts, including building funds, for shipments from stores for the use of the districts. The warrants shall be made payable to the “revolving fund of ____ (Here insert name or names of the school district or school districts establishing the fund.)”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

42832.

The revolving fund, when established, shall be used for the purchase of stores to be placed in stock and may be used for the payment of costs of receiving, storing, and delivering stores. Purchases shall be made in the manner prescribed by law. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as repealing any other provisions of law relating to school district funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42833.

The revolving fund shall be kept by the county treasurer as a separate fund and shall be subject to such uses only as are provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Special Reserve Fund [42840. - 42843.]

42840.

The governing board of a school district may provide for the accumulation over a period of school years of funds for capital outlay purposes and salaries of school district employees whose work is directly related to projects financed by those funds, derived from the receipt of taxes levied for the district and from other sources including balances, and not required to be used for other than capital outlay purposes.

The governing board of a school district may also provide for the accumulation over a period of school years of funds for other than capital outlay purposes, derived from the receipt of taxes levied for the district and from other sources including balances, and not required to be used for capital outlay purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 917, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

42841.

Upon the filing of identical copies of a resolution of the governing board with the superintendent of schools, auditor, and treasurer of the county specifying the purpose or purposes of a special reserve fund, the fund shall be established for such purpose or purposes. From time to time thereafter, the governing board may file identical copies of resolutions specifying additional purposes of the fund or withdrawing any purpose previously designated. The auditor and treasurer shall transfer from the general fund to the special reserve fund of the district such amounts as may be specified by the governing board during the fiscal year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

42842.

(a) The governing board may expend the money in the special reserve fund for capital outlay for the purpose or purposes specified in any resolution filed pursuant to Section 42841 unless the purpose has been withdrawn pursuant to that section. In addition, unless actually encumbered for ongoing expenses, the governing board may expend the money in the fund for the general operating purposes of the district.

(b) The governing board of a school district may expend the money in the special reserve fund that is maintained for purposes other than capital outlay in accordance with this section. Any moneys to be expended from this special reserve fund first shall be transferred into the general fund of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 17.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

42843.

Any moneys remaining in the special reserve fund of the district shall be transferred to the general fund of the district by the auditor and treasurer upon written request to the superintendent of schools, auditor, and treasurer of the county by the governing board of the district, and the auditor and treasurer shall discontinue the special reserve fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 759, Sec. 17.5.   Effective September 21, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Retiree Benefit Funds [42850. - 42850.]

42850.

The governing board of any school district may establish a fund for pension and other employee benefits to accumulate restricted moneys from salary reduction agreements, other contributions for employee retirement benefit payments, or both. Moneys may be transferred to the fund from other funds by periodic expense charges, in amounts based on existing and future obligation requirements. Payments from the pension plan and other employee benefits fund for insurance, annuities, administrative costs, or any other authorized purpose shall be made in accordance with all warrant approval requirements applicable under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1168, Sec. 28.   Effective September 30, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11.3. Educational Services [42920. - 42926.]

42920.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Foster Youth Services (FYS) program has been a successful program that supports the educational achievement of pupils in foster care. This success has contributed to landmark California education finance reform that prioritizes the educational needs of pupils in foster care.

(b) The county office of education FYS program is uniquely situated to support interagency collaboration and capacity building, both at the system and individual pupil level, focused on improving educational outcomes for pupils in foster care. This is a key component to the successful implementation of the local
 control funding formula (LCFF). The FYS program should support and facilitate such collaboration and capacity building while preserving the ability to provide direct services such as tutoring, mentoring, counseling, transition, school-based social work, and emancipation assistance when there are identified gaps in service at the local level and the local Executive Advisory Council establishes that these services are needed and aligned with local control and accountability plan priorities.

(c) Pupils in foster care will benefit from increased levels of supports and services as a result of the FYS program supporting implementation of the LCFF for pupils in foster care.

(d) Pupils in foster care represent one of the most vulnerable and academically at-promise pupil groups enrolled
 in California schools. The academic status of pupils in foster care is often profoundly impacted by the foster care system in which many pupils in foster care experience multiple placements with an average frequency of one placement change every six months. Due to this movement, pupils in foster care lose an average of four to six months of educational attainment with each move. Therefore, it is essential to recognize, identify, and plan for the critical and unique educational needs of pupils in foster care.

(e) A high percentage of pupils in foster care are working substantially below grade level, and over one-half of the pupils in foster care are retained at least one year in the same grade level. Pupils in foster care earn lower grades and achieve lower scores on standardized achievements tests in reading and mathematics, have lower
 levels of engagement in school, and are half as likely as pupils not in foster care to be involved in extracurricular activities. The long-term consequences of poor academic experiences are significant. Pupils in foster care are twice as likely as pupils not in foster care to drop out of school before graduation and only 45 percent of pupils in foster care have graduated from high school at the time of emancipation. Foster youth are similarly underrepresented in college enrollment rates and dramatically underperform their peers in relation to college completion. Pupils in foster care are also subject to disproportionate levels of disciplinary measures, including suspension and expulsion. It is imperative that California close the foster youth achievement gap so that pupils in foster care can realize their full potential, reach their college and career goals, and become independent, productive members
 of society.

(f) Foster youth are an especially vulnerable pupil population, as they are often also members of other underserved pupil groups. In 2013, the demographic data of pupils in foster care in California were as follows:

(1) The largest ethnic group amongst pupils in foster care was Hispanic, with nearly half of the population.

(2) African American and Native American pupils continue to be disproportionately represented in the child welfare system, as researchers found that 26 percent of pupils in foster care were African American despite African Americans only accounting for 7 percent of the pupil population in California, and 2 percent of pupils in foster care were Native American despite Native Americans
 only accounting for 1 percent of the pupil population in California.

(3) Nearly one in five pupils in foster care had special education needs, which is over twice the rate of the statewide pupil population.

(4) More than 1 in 10 pupils in foster care were English learners.

(5) A significant number of youth in foster care identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, questioning, or gender nonconforming.

(g) Compounded by the research that indicates that there is a need for California to close the achievement gap between specific ethnic pupil populations and White pupils, addressing the foster youth achievement gap will further efforts that support
 education equity for all pupils.

(h) Given their current academic status, pupils in foster care are more likely to achieve their full potential when they are provided services and programs designed to meet their particular needs, including, but not limited to, supplemental instruction, counseling, tutoring, support services offered to lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, questioning, and gender nonconforming youth, and other assistance relevant to their experience.

(i) Policies and laws addressing the educational rights of pupils in foster care must be implemented so that pupils in foster care are immediately enrolled in school, provided access to meaningful opportunities to meet state pupil academic achievement standards to which all pupils are held, provided access to a
 rigorous curriculum, adequately prepared to enter postsecondary education, and afforded the academic resources, services, and extracurricular and enrichment activities made available to other pupils enrolled in California’s public schools, including, but not limited to, interscholastic sports administered by the California Interscholastic Federation. In fulfilling their responsibilities to these pupils, educators, county placing agencies, caregivers, advocates, and the juvenile courts will work together to ensure that each pupil is placed in the least restrictive educational environment.

(j) Foster youth services programs provide pupils in foster care needed educational support and are a state priority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 8.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

42920.5.

(a) Commencing with the 2015–16 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Foster Youth Services Coordinating Program, administered by the Superintendent, is hereby established to provide supplemental funding to county offices of education, or a consortium of county offices of education, to coordinate and ensure that local educational agencies within its jurisdiction are providing services to foster youth pupils pursuant to the plan established in Section 42921, with the purpose of ensuring positive educational outcomes.

(b) A foster youth services coordinating program shall meet minimum standards established by the Superintendent to ensure the provisions of Section 42921 are implemented, and shall be required to
 meet those minimum standards annually as a condition of continued funding.

(c) As a condition of receiving funds, a county office of education, or a consortium of county offices of education, shall work with the local educational agencies within the county or consortium of counties, and shall coordinate services to ensure that, for the 2015–16 and 2016–17 fiscal years, the level of direct services provided to support foster youth pupils is not less than what was provided in the 2014–15 fiscal year through the foster youth services program established pursuant to Section 42921, as it read on June 30, 2015. In meeting this requirement, services for foster youth pupils may be provided through one or any combination of state funding, including, but not limited to, the local control funding formula, or federal, local, or other funding.

(d) For the 2015–16 fiscal year, the allocation
 amount for which any county office of education or consortium of county offices of education is eligible shall not be less than the amount allocated to that county or consortium in the 2014–15 fiscal year, including the allocation amounts of school districts identified in Section 42920, as it read on June 30, 2015. This subdivision applies only if a county office of education or consortium of county offices of education elects to apply for grant funding pursuant to Section 42921.

(e) On or before October 31, 2015, the Superintendent shall develop an allocation formula to determine the allocation amounts for which each county office of education or consortium of county offices of education is eligible. The Superintendent, within 30 days of the developing the allocation formula, shall submit the allocation formula to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and the Department of Finance for review, and the Department of
 Finance shall approve the allocation formula within 30 days of submission by the Superintendent. The allocation formula may be revised annually upon submission to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and approval by the Department of Finance within 30 days of submission by the Superintendent. The Superintendent may include additional criteria in the allocation formula, but shall apply, at a minimum, the following criteria:

(1) The number of pupils in foster care in the county.

(2) The number of school districts in the county.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), commencing with the 2016–17 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall provide a base grant of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to each participating county office of education or consortium of county offices of education that
 served at least one foster youth pupil in the prior fiscal year.

(g) After providing base grants pursuant to subdivision (f), the Superintendent shall allocate the remaining funding to participating county offices of education or consortium of county offices of education based on the following criteria:

(1) Seventy percent of the allocation shall be based on the number of pupils in foster care in the county.

(2) Thirty percent of the allocation shall be based on the number of school districts in the county.

(h) The allocation pursuant to subdivision (g) shall be applied after consideration of subdivision (b) of Section 42926.

(i) For purposes of this chapter, “local educational agency”
 means a county office of education, school district, or charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 29, Sec. 10.   (SB 828)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42921.

(a) A county office of education, or a consortium of county offices of education, may apply to the Superintendent for grant funding, to the extent funds are available, to operate an education-based foster youth services coordinating program to provide educational support for pupils in foster care.

(b) Each foster youth services coordinating program operated pursuant to this chapter, if sufficient funds are available, shall have at least one person identified as the foster youth educational services coordinator. The foster youth educational services coordinator shall facilitate the provision of educational support pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) to any pupil in
 foster care residing or attending school in the county or consortium of counties.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, a pupil in foster care means a foster youth, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.01, a foster child who is detained in a county-operated juvenile detention facility, or a child who is the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and has been identified by a county child welfare agency, probation department, or Indian tribe that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code as being at imminent risk of removal and placement into foster care.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that pupils in foster care with the greatest need for services be identified as the first priority for foster youth services coordinating programs. Priority shall be given to pupils who are living in out-of-home placements.

(e) As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this chapter, each foster youth services coordinating program operated by a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education pursuant to this chapter shall develop and implement a foster youth services coordinating plan for purposes of establishing guiding principles and protocols to provide supports for foster care pupils aligned with the population priorities established in subdivision (f). The plan shall include, to the extent possible, but not be limited to, all of
 the following:

(1) (A) A description of how the program will establish ongoing collaboration with local educational agencies, county child welfare agencies, and county probation
 departments
 to determine the proper educational placement of the foster youth. This includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Building the capacity of county agencies, school districts, and community organizations to better support the educational success of pupils in foster care.

(ii) Facilitating collaboration between county agencies, school districts, and community organizations to ensure coordinated and nonduplicative service delivery and to ensure pupils in foster care receive the educational supports and services they need to succeed in school. This may include, but is not limited to, education emancipation services such as support with transitions to postsecondary education or career technical education programs.

(iii) Providing services and educational case management in support of individual pupils in foster care, as necessary. This may include, but is not limited to, transition and school social work to support transition between schools or school districts.

(B) The primary goal of the collaboration required pursuant to this section shall be to minimize changes in school placement by supporting the implementation of Section 48850, subdivision (c) of Section 48853, and all related statutes that pertain to pupils in foster care. As necessary, and in accordance with Section 48853.5, the foster youth services coordinating program may pay for the cost of transportation to support this subparagraph.

(i) If it is in the best interests of a pupil in foster care to transfer schools, the foster youth services coordinating program shall support local educational agencies in the implementation of Section 48853.5, and all related statutes pertaining to pupils in foster care, such as ensuring transfers are done at an educationally appropriate time, educational records are quickly transferred, appropriate partial credits are awarded, and the pupil in foster care is quickly enrolled in appropriate classes.

(ii) In determining the appropriate educational placement of foster youth pupils, local educational agencies, county welfare agencies, and county probation departments shall consult with an educational rights holder, caregiver, social worker, teacher, counselor, court-appointed special advocate, other stakeholders, and the pupil, as appropriate. The purpose of the consultation shall be
 to ensure all educational programmatic options are considered, including, but not limited to, English learner, special education, advanced placement, and career technical education.

(2) (A) If a foster youth educational services coordinator annually determines that the foster youth services coordinator is unable, through coordinating activities required under this section and using any other state, federal, local, or private funds, to
 secure tutoring, mentoring, and
 counseling services provided by a foster youth pupil’s school district, and if those services are established as needed and identified by the foster youth educational services coordinator, the foster youth services coordinating program may provide those
 services to the pupil.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature that local educational agencies include information provided in subparagraph (C) in their local control and accountability plans when describing their services for foster youth pupils as required pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (d) of Section 52066.

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that county offices of education, in the development and adoption of their local control and accountability plans, include information specific to the transition requirement established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42920.5, when describing the coordination of services for foster youth pupils required pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (d) of Section 52066.

(3) (A) Policies and
 procedures to ensure educational placement for a foster youth pupil is not delayed, including, but not limited to, facilitating the establishment of an individualized education program in accordance with the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), if applicable, the transfer of records, transcripts, and other relevant educational information.

(B) The plan shall also describe how the program will facilitate coordination with local postsecondary educational institutions, including, but not limited to, the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California, to ensure foster youth pupils meet admission requirements and access programs that support their matriculation needs. The plan shall describe how the program will coordinate efforts to ensure, to the extent possible, the completion of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid or the California Dream Act
 Application for foster youth pupils who are in grade 12.

(4) Policies and procedures for local educational agencies, county welfare agencies, and county probation departments to share all relevant educational information for foster youth to ensure the court has updated and accurate information as it makes decisions regarding foster youths.

(f) When developing the plan required pursuant to this section, the county office of education, or the consortium of county offices of education, shall consider the needs of specific age groups, pupils in foster care in specific geographic areas with the highest concentration of pupils in foster care, and pupils in foster care with the greatest academic need. A foster youth services coordinating program is encouraged to first provide services for pupils in foster care who reside in group homes, institutional settings, or other placements with
 pupils with high academic needs, as determined by the local Executive Advisory Council.

(g) (1) Each foster youth services coordinating program operated pursuant to this chapter shall establish a local interagency Executive Advisory Council.

(2) The Executive Advisory Council may include representatives from the county child welfare agency, the county probation department, local educational agencies, local postsecondary educational institutions, and community organizations. If possible, the Executive Advisory Council may include, but is not limited to, foster youth, caregivers, educational rights holders, dependency attorneys, court representatives, court-appointed special advocates, and other interested stakeholders.

(3) The foster youth educational services coordinator shall be a permanent
 member of the Executive Advisory Council.
